Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1508
Agreements; prohibited provisions.

Nothing in the State-Tribal Cooperative Agreements Act shall be construed to authorize an agreement that:

(1) Is not permitted by federal law. The parties to an agreement should deal with substantive matters and enforcement matters that can be mutually agreed upon, but no agreement shall affect the underlying jurisdictional authority of any party unless expressly authorized by Congress;

(2) Authorizes a public agency or tribal government, either separately or pursuant to agreement, to expand or diminish the jurisdiction presently exercised by the government of the United States to make criminal laws for or enforce criminal laws in Indian country; or

(3) Authorizes a public agency or tribal government to enter into an agreement except as authorized by their own organizational documents or enabling laws.

Laws 1989, LB 508, § 8.